Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,135
Violation of confidentiality; perjury; penalty.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act, any person who violates the confidentiality of a commission proceeding pursuant to the act shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(2) A person who willfully affirms or swears falsely in regard to any material matter before a commission proceeding pursuant to the act shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 135;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 59;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 62.